South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S689.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 58-7-10 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (B) The provisions of this section and of Chapter 2, Title 28 do not apply to private, for-profit pipeline companies, including publicly traded for-profit companies, that are not defined within this title as a public utility. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----